New Jersey, session 221, A3828.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. Notwithstanding any provision of Title 19 of the Revised Statutes, or any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the blank forms of petitions to be used by candidates to be voted for at the primary election by the voters of a political party shall be made available by the Secretary of State, county clerks, or municipal clerks, as the case may be, for the next years primary election within 10 calendar days of the certification of the general election results by the board of county canvassers pursuant to R.S.19:19-13. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.